Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.8a of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A pharmacy located outside of this state that ships drugs


into this state shall be licensed by the State Board of Pharmacy and


shall be subject to applicable laws of this state including, but not


limited to, the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act and rules promulgated by the


Board.


B. A pharmacy described in subsection A of this section shall


be subject to disciplinary action as provided by subsection D of


this section if the pharmacy commits any of the following:

Req. No. 717 Page 1


1. Violation of the pharmacy technician-to-pharmacist ratio


prescribed by rules of the Board;


2. Shipping of any drug into this state whose active


ingredients and regimen would be used by the patient to induce an


abortion in violation of state law;


3. Failure to follow manufacturer storage and delivery


guidelines; or


4. Any other violation as determined by the Board.


C. The Board shall perform an initial on-site inspection of all


pharmacies that meet the description of subsection A of this


section:


1. Within six (6) months of the effective date of this act if


the pharmacy is in operation on the effective date of this act; or


2. As soon as practicable if the pharmacy begins operating


after the effective date of this act.


The Board shall also perform subsequent annual on-site


inspections of all pharmacies that meet the description of


subsection A of this section.


D. 1. If, upon inspection, the Board discovers a violation


described in subsection B of this section, the Board shall notify


the pharmacist in charge of such violation, shall order the


pharmacist in charge to correct such violation, and shall impose a


fine for each violation not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars


($50,000.00).

Req. No. 717 Page 2


2. The Board shall perform an additional on-site inspection of


the pharmacy within ninety (90) days following the notice of


violation to determine whether all violations have been corrected.


3. If all such violations have been corrected, the Board shall


so notify the pharmacist in charge and no additional disciplinary


action shall be taken by the Board; however, the pharmacy shall be


subject to follow-up on-site inspections every six (6) months until


no violations are found for at least two inspections.


4. If the pharmacy refuses or fails to correct a violation, the


Board shall permanently revoke the license of the pharmacy and the


pharmacist in charge.


E. The inspections required by this section shall be performed:


1. Directly by inspectors employed by the Board. The Board


shall not rely solely on inspections performed by out-of-state


regulatory agencies to satisfy the inspection requirements provided


by this section; and


2. At the expense of the pharmacy.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-717 DC 1/16/2025 2:32:36 PM









Req. No. 717 Page 3